Utah statutes.
78B-11-106.   Application for judicial relief.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 78B-11-129, an application for judicial relief under this chapter shall be made by motion to the court and heard in the manner provided by law or rule of court for making and hearing motions.

(2)  Unless a civil action involving the agreement to arbitrate is pending, notice of an initial motion to the court under this chapter shall be served in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action.  Otherwise, notice of the motion must be given in the manner provided by law or rule of court for serving motions in pending cases.

